src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs !!= @CODE@
dagw% k̲agán:dagw% k̲agáan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to save C from destruction using their strength" ;
dáal% k'án:dáal% k'áan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to set, form after pollination, from the rain [said of fruit]" ;
dlán:dláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to wash O, rinse O" ;
gud% stl'ahlán:gud% stl'ahláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to be diffident about X" ;
guhlán:guhláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S (pl) to hang their heads down because they don't like what is being said" ;
gwáawa% k̲agán:gwáawa% k̲agáan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to save themselves by refusing to go along with a suggestion" ;
gyúuhlan:gyúuhláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to just hear about X second hand" ;
g̲i% k̲agán:g̲i% k̲agáan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to save C from destruction by staying away from trouble" ;
hlg̲áan% k̲'íihlan:hlg̲áan% k̲'íihláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to hop on one leg" ;
hlku% guhlán:hlku% guhláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S (sg) to be stingy with X" ;
hlk̲'án:hlk̲'áan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to tangle up (in location) [said of 1-D objects, or people's legs only]" ;
ja% k̲agán:ja% k̲agáan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to miss C when shooting at it [said of a game animal]" ;
k'án:k'áan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to form after pollination, to set [said of fruit only]" ;
kílhlan:kílhláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to bawl out X" ;
k'udlán:k'udláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to paint O" ;
k̲a% k̲án:k̲a% k̲áan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S (sg) to meet, run across, come across O (sg) [said of people and animals only]" ;
k̲agán:k̲agáan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to escape destruction, be safe" ;
k̲áw% gáwhlan:k̲áw% gáwhláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to be spread out [said of fog only]" ;
k̲eh% k̲agán:k̲eh% k̲agáan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to save C from destruction by spotting trouble" ;
k̲ehhlán:k̲ehhláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to keep an eye on X" ;
stláandlan:stláandláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to wash their hands" ;
ta% dlán:ta% dláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to wash fish before canning (especially as in a cannery)" ;
ta% k'án:ta% k'áan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for berries to form after pollination" ;
ta% k'udlán:ta% k'udláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to paint, do some painting" ;
t'a% k̲agán:t'a% k̲agáan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to save C from destruction by running away" ;
tíi% k̲agán:tíi% k̲agáan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to save themselves by going to bed instead of going out" ;
tla% k̲agán:tla% k̲agáan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to lose C off a hook [said of a fish]" ;
tl'ahlán:tl'ahláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to be clinker-built [said of a boat]" ;
tl'án:tl'áan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to suck milk" ;
xál% k'án:xál% k'áan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to set, form after pollination, from sunshine [said of fruit]" ;
xi% k̲agán:xi% k̲agáan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to save C from destruction by going and getting food" ;
xuhlán:xuhláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to blow hard at X [said of the wind]" ;
x̲ándlan:x̲ándláan CLASS-AN-STEM-2 "for S to cut open ventral surface of C (pl) [bears] so as to get a square skin" ;
